Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 40
GEOTHERMAL HEAT SUPPLIERS

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Geothermal Resources Act", see article 90.5 of title 37.

Section

40-40-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Geothermal Heat Suppliers Act".

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1422, § 2, effective June 10.

40-40-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that geothermal heat is a valuable, indigenous resource, the development of which will enhance local economies, and that it is in the public interest of the state to promote the development of geothermal heat supply systems. Therefore, it is the policy of this state to remove the barriers to such development which might result from the imposition of comprehensive regulation by the public utilities commission.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1423, § 2, effective June 10.

40-40-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado.

"Geothermal heat supplier" means any person who supplies geothermally heated groundwater or other substances to the public or other customers for industrial process heat, commercial use, space heating, or other purposes. The term includes systems which enhance the thermal content of the substance supplied through the use of heat pumps, solar assistance, or other means.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1423, § 2, effective June 10.

40-40-104. Public utility status - exceptions.

Geothermal heat suppliers are found to be affected with the public interest and subject to the limited jurisdiction and regulation of the commission as described in this article only.

Geothermal heat suppliers which are selling at wholesale to other entities which are reselling the heat or converting it to electricity are exempt from the provisions of this article and any other provisions which might subject such geothermal heat suppliers to the jurisdiction of the commission.

Municipal and county geothermal heat suppliers acting alone, together, or in concert with private parties are exempt from the provisions of this article and any other provisions which might subject such entities to the jurisdiction of the commission, except as to service provided outside of their boundaries.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1423, § 2, effective June 10.

40-40-105. Operating permits.

The commission shall establish a system of operating permits for geothermal heat suppliers. Before commencing construction of distribution facilities, a geothermal heat supplier must obtain an operating permit from the commission. An operating permit:

May not be denied because the area which the applicant proposes to serve is already being served by a gas or electric utility;

May not convey an exclusive right to supply geothermal heat in the area which the applicant proposes to serve;

Shall describe the area the applicant intends to serve and the nature of such service;

Shall require the applicant to enter into a contract with each customer. The contract, of which only the form and scope are subject to commission review, must specify, at least:

The period of time during which service will be provided;

The rates or the method for determining rates to be charged during the term of the contract, as negotiated by the parties and not subject to commission approval;

That the geothermal heat supplier will submit to the complaint procedures contained in section 40-6-108.

Before issuing an operating permit, the commission must find that:

The applicant is fit, willing, and able to provide the proposed services; and

The applicant has made an adequate showing that the geothermal heat supply and distribution system appears reasonably capable of delivering the proposed services.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1423, § 2, effective June 10.

40-40-106. Continuing review.

The commission has continuing authority over geothermal heat suppliers to enforce the provisions of this article and to ensure that a geothermal heat supplier adheres to the conditions of its operating permit.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1424, § 2, effective June 10.